Florida, session 2026, HB1535.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 775.085, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
775.085 Evidencing prejudice while committing offense;
reclassification.—
(1)(a) The penalty for any felony or misdemeanor shall be
reclassified as provided in this subsection if the commission of
such felony or misdemeanor evidences prejudice based on the
race, color, ancestry, ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation,
national origin, homeless status, or advanced age of the victim
or prejudice based on the victim being a disabled adult:
1. A misdemeanor of the second degree is reclassified to a
misdemeanor of the first degree.
2. A misdemeanor of the first degree is reclassified to a
felony of the third degree.
3. A felony of the third degree is reclassified to a
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1535-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1535 2026
felony of the second degree.
4. A felony of the second degree is reclassified to a
felony of the first degree.
5. A felony of the first degree is reclassified to a life
felony.
(b) As used in paragraph (a), the term:
1. "Advanced age" means that the victim is older than 65
years of age.
2. "Disabled adult" means an individual 18 years of age or
older who suffers from a condition of physical or mental
incapacitation due to a developmental disability, organic brain
damage, or mental illness, or who has one or more physical or
mental limitations that restrict the person's ability to perform
the normal activities of daily living.
3. "Homeless status" means that the victim:
a. Lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime
residence; or
b. Has a primary nighttime residence that is:
(I) A supervised publicly or privately operated shelter
designed to provide temporary living accommodations; or
(II) A public or private place not designed for, or
ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human
beings.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1535-00